California, session 20252026, SB773.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2710.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2710.5. The board, with permission of the Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs, board may form advisory committees to advise the board on the implementation of this chapter. Members of such advisory committees shall be entitled to a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.